Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-270
Violations; administrative fine.

After notice and a hearing, the commission may administratively fine pursuant to section 75-156 violators of the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act or the applicable rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 19;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-1111;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 132.